Montana, session 2025, SB350.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 20-5-112, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-5-112. Participation in extracurricular activities. (1) (a) A Except as provided in subsection
(1)(b), a school district or an athletic association, conference, or organization with authority over interscholastic
sports may not prohibit or restrict the ability of a student attending a nonpublic or home school meeting the
requirements of 20-5-109 from participating in extracurricular activities at a school in the student's resident
school district solely on the student's enrollment at the public school or on the number of hours the student
physically attends the public school.
(b) A school district or an athletic association, conference, or organization with authority over
interscholastic sports may prohibit or restrict the participation in extracurricular activities of a student attending a
home school based on one or both of the following factors:
(i) the student's status as a United States citizen; and
(ii) the student's status as a Montana resident, as determined under the provisions of 1-1-215.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (1) and (3), a student attending a nonpublic or home school
who participates in extracurricular activities at a public school is subject to:
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 350
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 350
(a) the same standards for participation as those required of full-time students enrolled in the
school;
(b) the same rules of any interscholastic organization of which the school of participation is a
member.
(3) (a) The academic eligibility for extracurricular participation for a student attending a nonpublic
school must be attested by the head administrator of the nonpublic school.
(b) The academic eligibility for extracurricular participation for a student attending a home school
must be attested in writing by the educator providing the student instruction with verification by the school
principal. The verification may not include any form of student assessment."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 350
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 350, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 350
INTRODUCED BY M. REGIER
AN ACT REVISING EDUCATION LAWS RELATED TO EXTRACURRICULAR PARTICIPATION; ALLOWING
SCHOOL DISTRICTS OR ATHLETIC ORGANIZATIONS TO RESTRICT EXTRACURRICULAR
PARTICIPATION OF HOME SCHOOL STUDENTS WHO ARE NOT CITIZENS OF THE UNITED STATES OR
RESIDENTS OF MONTANA; AMENDING SECTION 20-5-112, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE
EFFECTIVE DATE.”